Idaho, session 2025, H0283.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 24, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-2407, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-2407. GOVERNOR -- PERSONNEL. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law to the contrary, the governor shall not bill other state departments
or constitutional officers for personnel employed by the governor.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.